Maryland, session 2025, HB0964.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force on the Displacement of Residents of Emory Grove.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb0964*

HOUSE BILL 964
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) the Director of the Montgomery County Office of Human Rights;
(2) the Chair of the Montgomery County Planning Board, or the Chair’s
designee;
(3) (i) the Executive Director of the Housing Opportunities Commission
of Montgomery County; or
(ii) a member of the Board of Commissioners, designated by the
Executive Director;
(4) one member of the Montgomery County Historical Society Montgomery
History, designated by the Society Montgomery History;
(5) one member who has professional experience in issues of discrimination
or housing, appointed by the Montgomery County Council;
(6) one member who has professional experience in issues of discrimination
or housing, appointed by the Montgomery County Executive;
(7) one member of the Montgomery County Racial Equity and Social
Justice Advisory Committee, designated by the Committee;
(8) the Pastor of the Emory Grove United Methodist Church; and
(9) one member who is a former resident of the Emory Grove community
and lived in the community at any time between 1960 and 1985, designated by the Pastor
of the Emory Grove United Methodist Church.
(c) The Director of the Montgomery County Office of Human Rights shall serve
as the chair of the Task Force.
(d) The Montgomery County Office of Human Rights shall provide staff for the
Task Force.
(e) (1) The Task Force shall hold its first meeting not later than July 1, 2025,
and meet at least quarterly thereafter.
(2) The Task Force may hold additional meetings as determined necessary
by the chair.
(f) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but

HOUSE BILL 964 3
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) The Task Force shall:
(1) review and analyze the displacement of residents of Emory Grove under
the urban renewal program carried out from 1960 through 1985 in order to:
(i) determine the basis for the development of the Emory Grove
urban renewal program and the guidelines and execution of the program, including how
property was acquired or purchased from landowners;
(ii) analyze the way urban renewal was administered in Emory
Grove;
(iii) analyze the decisions to use the urban renewal program in
Emory Grove and the equity impacts of the program;
(iv) analyze the guidelines and execution of the urban renewal
program in Emory Grove, including the purchase of property from landowners and the
demolition of homes;
(v) determine the basis for the purchase of property from
landowners in Emory Grove and identify the details of land purchases, including the
purchase prices and purchase agreements; and
(vi) analyze the plan for providing replacement properties or new
homeownership for the displaced residents of Emory Grove and the equity impacts of the
plan, including proposed dates to provide new replacement properties and incentives or
benefits for previous landowners; and
(2) if deemed appropriate by the Task Force, recommend remedies for past
inequities in the purchase of land by Montgomery County through the urban renewal
program in Emory Grove from 1960 to 1985, including methods for determining eligibility
and providing compensation, such as benefits for former landowners and incentives for
construction projects.
(h) (1) On or before December 15, 2025, the Task Force shall submit an interim
report of its findings and recommendations to the Montgomery County Council, the
Montgomery County Executive, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Montgomery County delegation to the General Assembly.
(2) On or before December 15, 2026, the Task Force shall submit a final
report of its findings and recommendations to the Montgomery County Council, the
Montgomery County Executive, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Montgomery County delegation to the General Assembly.

HOUSE BILL 964
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.